Maryland, session 2025, HB0815.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Tax – General
10–208.
(a) In addition to the modification under § 10–207 of this subtitle, the amounts
under this section are subtracted from the federal adjusted gross income of a resident to
determine Maryland adjusted gross income.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb0815*

HOUSE BILL 815
(i–1) (1) (i) In this subsection the following words have the meanings
indicated.
(ii) “Public safety organization” means:
1. a bona fide Maryland police agency;
2. a bona fide Maryland fire, rescue, or emergency medical
services organization;
3. an auxiliary organization of a bona fide Maryland fire,
rescue, or emergency medical services organization;
4. the United States Coast Guard Auxiliary;
5. the Maryland Defense Force; or
6. the Maryland Civil Air Patrol.
(iii) “Public safety volunteer” means a member of a public safety
organization.
(2) The subtraction under subsection (a) of this section includes an amount
equal to the amount specified in paragraph (4) of this subsection if an individual is a
qualifying public safety volunteer for the taxable year, as determined under paragraph (3)
of this subsection.
(3) An individual is a qualifying public safety volunteer for the taxable year
eligible for the subtraction modification under this subsection if the individual:
(i) is an active member of a public safety organization;
(ii) serves the public safety organization in a volunteer capacity
without compensation, except nominal expenses or meals;
(iii) 1. qualifies for active status during the taxable year under:
A. a police auxiliary or reserve volunteer program approved
by the Maryland Police Training and Standards Commission in conjunction with the
Maryland Association of Counties and the Maryland Municipal League that includes
uniform systems for qualification and record keeping, if the program is incorporated into
the police agency’s rules and regulations;
B. a volunteer fire, rescue, or emergency medical services
personnel or auxiliary length of service award program operated by a county or municipal
corporation of the State, if the length of service award program requires for active status

HOUSE BILL 815 3
qualification a minimum of 50 points per year and that points be earned in at least two
different categories; or
C. a point system established by a county or municipal
corporation that does not operate a volunteer fire, rescue, or emergency medical services
personnel or auxiliary length of service award program or by the United States Coast Guard
Auxiliary, the Maryland Defense Force, or the Maryland Civil Air Patrol, to identify active
members of a volunteer fire, rescue, or emergency medical services organization or
auxiliary organization, if the point system requires for active status qualification a
minimum of 50 points per year and that points be earned in at least two different categories;
2. has maintained active status for at least 25 years under:
A. a police auxiliary or reserve volunteer program; or
B. a volunteer fire, rescue, or emergency medical services
personnel or auxiliary length of service award program or a point system established in
lieu of a length of service award program;
3. is a member of the National Guard or other reserve
component of the United States armed forces who has been ordered into active military
service and who serves on active duty in the armed forces of the United States during the
taxable year; or
4. is a civilian or a member of the Merchant Marine on
assignment in support of the armed forces of the United States during the taxable year in
an area designated as a combat zone by executive order of the President; and
(iv) will have been an active member of a public safety organization
for at least 36 months during the last 10 calendar years by December 31 of the taxable year.
(4) The amount of the subtraction under paragraph (2) of this subsection is
equal to:
(I) $7,000 FOR A TAXABLE YEAR BEGINNING AFTER DECEMBER
31, 2023, BUT BEFORE JANUARY 1, 2025; AND
(II) $10,000 FOR A TAXABLE YEAR BEGINNING AFTER
DECEMBER 31, 2024.
(5) (i) Each police agency shall:
1. maintain a record of the activities of each member of a
police auxiliary or reserve during the calendar year;

HOUSE BILL 815
2. provide each member a report by February 15 of the
following year indicating that the member qualified during the preceding calendar year;
and
3. provide a report that includes the names, Social Security
numbers, and a certification that the individual qualified for the subtraction modification
under this section.
(ii) Each fire, rescue, or emergency medical services organization or
auxiliary organization shall:
1. maintain a record of the points earned by each individual
during each calendar year;
2. provide each member a report identifying the number of
points earned in each category by February 15 of the following year; and
3. provide a report that includes the names, Social Security
numbers, and points earned by those members qualifying for the subtraction modification
under this subsection to the Maryland State [Firemen’s] FIREFIGHTERS Association by
May 1 of the following year.
(iii) An individual may not qualify for the subtraction under this
subsection based on membership in the United States Coast Guard Auxiliary, the Maryland
Defense Force, or the Maryland Civil Air Patrol unless the United States Coast Guard
Auxiliary, the Maryland Defense Force, or the Maryland Civil Air Patrol:
1. maintains a record of the points earned by each individual
during each calendar year;
2. provides each member a report identifying the number of
points earned in each category by February 15 of the following year; and
3. provides a report that includes the names, Social Security
numbers, and points earned by those members qualifying for the subtraction modification
under this subsection to the Comptroller on or before October 1 of each year.
(6) To qualify for the subtraction modification under this subsection, an
individual shall attach to the individual’s income tax return a copy of the report provided
by the public safety organization under paragraph (5) of this subsection.
(7) (i) On or before October 1 each year, each bona fide Maryland police
agency shall submit to the Department of Public Safety and Correctional Services and the
Office of the Comptroller a report listing the names and Social Security numbers of
individuals who qualified for the subtraction modification under this subsection for the
preceding taxable year.

HOUSE BILL 815 5
(ii) On or before October 1 of each year, the Maryland State
[Firemen’s] FIREFIGHTERS Association shall submit to the Department of Public Safety
and Correctional Services and the Office of the Comptroller a report stating the
participation in the point system by the various local subdivisions with the names and
Social Security numbers of individuals who qualified for the subtraction modification under
this subsection for the preceding taxable year.
(8) (i) A person may not knowingly make or cause any false statement
or report to be made in any application or in any document required under this subsection.
(ii) Any person who violates or attempts to violate any provision of
subparagraph (i) of this paragraph shall be subject to a fine of $1,000.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2025.